Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-608
Commissioner; distribution; duty.

The Commissioner of Labor shall furnish eight copies of the text of the Employment Security Law and his or her rules and regulations to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 11, p. 391;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-711;

R.S.1943, § 48-608;

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 16;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 10;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 192, § 4.